Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB755.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of November 27, 2019 (P.L.667, No.92), entitled "An act abolishing numerous State authorities, boards, commissions, committees, councils and representatives; and making related repeals," is amended to read:Section 1. State authorities, boards, commissions, committees, councils and representatives abolishment.The following State authorities, boards, commissions, committees, councils and representatives, as established by law, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 are abolished:(1) The Advisory Committee on Probation within the Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole.(1.1) The Canine Health Board.(1.2) The Climate Change Advisory Committee within the Department of Environmental Protection.(1.3) The Coastal Zone Advisory Committee within the Department of Environmental Protection.(1.4) The Flood Insurance Premium Assistance Task Force.(1.5) The Greater Pennsylvania Council.(1.6) The High Speed Intercity Passenger Rail Commission.(2) The Industrial Resource Center Strategic Advisory Board within the Department of Community and Economic Development.(2.1) The Interagency Coordinating Council.(3) The joint committee to review the cost-of-living supplements under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8348 (relating to supplemental annuities) and 71 Pa.C.S. § 5708 (relating to supplemental annuities).(3.1) The Lobbying Disclosure Regulations Committee.(3.2) The Pennsylvania Civil Disorder Authority.(3.3) The Pennsylvania Dairy Future Commission.(4) The Pennsylvania Public Television Network Commission.(4.1) The Prevailing Wage Advisory Board within the Department of Labor and Industry.(5) The Public Television Broadcasting Advisory Council.(6) The Pennsylvania Quality Leadership Awards Council.(6.1) The Recycling Fund Advisory Committee within the 20250SB0755PN0941 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Environmental Protection.(6.2) The Senior Citizen Advisory Committee within the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(7) The Small Business Advocacy Council within the Department of Community and Economic Development.(8) The Tobacco Use Prevention and Cessation Advisory Committee within the Department of Health.(9) The legislative representative for collective bargaining appointed under 71 Pa.C.S. § 2205 (relating to legislative representation for collective bargaining).Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1.1. Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission.(a) Membership.--The Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission established under section 6 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, shall consist of the following members:(1) Two individuals appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) Two individuals appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(3) Two individuals appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) Two individuals appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(5) One individual appointed by the Governor.(6) One individual appointed by the Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(7) One individual appointed by the Auditor General of the Commonwealth.(b) Terms, vacancies and absences.--20250SB0755PN0941 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A member appointed under subsection (a) shall hold office for a term of five years or until the member's successor is duly appointed.(2) Vacancies occurring in an office of a member of the commission by expiration of term, death, resignation, removal or for any other reason shall be filled in the manner provided in subsection (a) for the balance of the term.(3) Commission members failing to attend meetings for three consecutive months shall forfeit their seats unless the chairperson receives written notification from the member involved that the absence was due to personal illness or the death or illness of an immediate family member.(c) Chairperson.--The members of the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission shall elect a member to serve as chairperson of the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission.Section 1.2. Transfer of duties.The following duties are transferred:(1) The Secretary of Agriculture shall carry out the duties of the former Canine Health Board under section 207(h)(7) and (8) and (i)(3) and (5) of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall carry out the duties of the former Lobbying Disclosure Regulations Committee under 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A10(d)(5) and (6) (relating to registration fees; fund established; system; regulations).Section 1.3. Duty of Secretary of the Commonwealth.Within 10 days of the effective date of this section, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall, pursuant to Article IV of the Interstate Rail Passenger Advisory Council Compact, give notice to the other participating states of the repeal of the 20250SB0755PN0941 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act of June 22, 1980 (P.L.259, No.75), entitled "An act a dopting the interstate high speed intercity rail passenger network compact and for related purposes."Section 3. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2. Repeals.Repeals are as follows:* * *(3) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (4) are necessary to effectuate section 1(1.1) of this act.(4) (i) Section 221 of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, is repealed.(ii) Section 207(h)(7) and (8) and (i)(3) and (5) of the Dog Law are repealed to the extent of any inconsistency with section 1(1.1) of this act.(5) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (6) are necessary to effectuate section 1(1.2) of this act.(6) The following provisions of the act of July 9, 2008 (P.L.935, No.70), known as the Pennsylvania Climate Change Act, are repealed:(i) The definition of "committee" in section 2 of that act.(ii) The phrase "and the committee" in section 3(b) of that act.(iii) The phrases "In consultation with the committee," and "and the committee" in section 4(a) and (c), respectively, of that act.(iv) Section 5 of that act.20250SB0755PN0941 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The phrase ", in consultation with the committee," in section 7(a) and paragraph (4) of the subsection of that act.(7) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (8) are necessary to effectuate section 1(1.4) of this act.(8) Article XV-C of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is repealed.(9) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (10) is necessary to effectuate section 1(1.5) of this act.(10) The act of May 29, 1931 (P.L.278, No.131), entitled "An act creating a "Greater Pennsylvania Council" for the promotion of the economic, social, industrial, agricultural, educational, civic and recreational welfare of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and its citizens; prescribing the organization, powers and duties of said council; and making an appropriation," is repealed.(11) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (12) is necessary to effectuate section 1(1.6) of this act.(12) The act of December 22, 1981 (P.L.518, No.144), known as the High Speed Intercity Rail Passenger Commission Act, is repealed.(13) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (14) is necessary to effectuate section 1(2.1) of this act.(14) Section 6 of the act of October 22, 1986 (P.L.1452, No.143), known as the Pennsylvania Adult and Family Literacy 20250SB0755PN0941 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education Act, is repealed.(15) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (16) is necessary to effectuate section 1(3.1) of this act.(16) 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A10(d)(1), (2), (3) and (4) (relating to registration fees; fund established; system; regulations) are repealed.(17) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (18) is necessary to effectuate section 1(3.2) of this act.(18) Articles III and IV of the Act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.738, No.233), known as the Pennsylvania Fair Plan Act, are repealed.(19) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (20) is necessary to effectuate section 1(3.3) of this act.(20) 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 9 (relating to Pennsylvania Dairy Future Commission) is repealed.(21) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (22) is necessary to effectuate section 1(4.1) of this act.(22) The following provisions of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, are repealed:(i) Section 2(9) of that act.(ii) Section 2.1 of that act.(iii) So much of section 2.2(c) of that act that states: "No member of the Advisory Board created by this amendatory act shall be appointed to the Appeals Board."(iv) The phrase ", after consultation with the 20250SB0755PN0941 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advisory board," in section 7 of that act.(23) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (24) is necessary to effectuate section 1(6.1) of this act.(24) Section 706(e) of the act of July 28, 1988 (P.L.556, No.101), known as the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act, is repealed.(25) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (26) is necessary to effectuate section 1(6.2) of this act.(26) The act of December 21, 1998 (P.L.187, No.152), known as the Senior Citizen Advisory Committee Act, is repealed.(27) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (28) are necessary to effectuate section 1.1 of this act.(28) Section 6(b) and (d) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are repealed.(29) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (30) is necessary to effectuate section 1.3 of this act.(30) The act of June 22, 1980 (P.L.259, No.75), is repealed.Section 4. The provisions of Executive Order 1980-20, 4 Pa. Code Ch. 1 Subch. EE are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the addition of section 1(1.3) of the act.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0755PN0941 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728